fi: Epäpuhtauksien poisto: Bakteerit; Kemikaalit ja kloori; Raskasmetallit; Mikromuovit; Alkueläimet ja kystat; Sedimentti; Maku ja haju; Virukset; Muu
lt-LT: Teršalų šalinimas: Bakterijos; Cheminės medžiagos ir chloras; Sunkieji metalai; Mikroplastikas; Pirmuonys ir cistos; Nuosėdos; Skonis ir kvapas; Virusai; Kita
el: Αφαίρεση ρύπων: Βακτήρια; Χημικά και χλώριο; Βαρέα μέταλλα; Μικροπλαστικά; Πρωτόζωα και κύστεις; Ίζημα; Γεύση και οσμή; Ιοί; Άλλο
sk-SK: Odstraňovanie znečisťujúcich látok: Baktérie; Chemikálie a chlór; Ťažké kovy; Mikroplasty; Prvoky a cysty; Usadeniny; Chuť a zápach; Vírusy; Iné
zh-TW: 污染物去除: 細菌; 化學物質與氯; 重金屬; 微塑膠; 原蟲與包囊; 沉積物; 味道與氣味; 病毒; 其他
nb: Fjerning av forurensninger: Bakterier; Kjemikalier og klor; Tungmetaller; Mikroplast; Protozoer og cyster; Sediment; Smak og lukt; Virus; Annet
de: Schadstoffentfernung: Bakterien; Chemikalien und Chlor; Schwermetalle; Mikroplastik; Protozoen und Zysten; Sedimente; Geschmack und Geruch; Viren; Sonstige
vi: Loại bỏ chất gây ô nhiễm: Vi khuẩn; Hóa chất và clo; Kim loại nặng; Vi nhựa; Động vật nguyên sinh và bào nang; Cặn; Mùi và vị; Vi-rút; Khác
ro-RO: Îndepărtarea contaminanților: Bacterii; Substanțe chimice și clor; Metale grele; Microplastice; Protozoare și chisturi; Sedimente; Gust și miros; Virusuri; Altele
sv: Borttagning av föroreningar: Bakterier; Kemikalier och klor; Tungmetaller; Mikroplaster; Urdjur och cystor; Sediment; Smak och lukt; Virus; Annat
hu: Szennyezőanyag-eltávolítás: Baktériumok; Vegyszerek és klór; Nehézfémek; Mikroműanyagok; Protozoonok és ciszták; Üledék; Íz és szag; Vírusok; Egyéb
sl-SI: Odstranjevanje onesnaževal: Bakterije; Kemikalije in klor; Težke kovine; Mikroplastika; Praživali in ciste; Usedline; Okus in vonj; Virusi; Drugo
es: Eliminación de contaminantes: Bacterias; Químicos y cloro; Metales pesados; Microplásticos; Protozoos y quistes; Sedimentos; Sabor y olor; Virus; Otros
ja: 汚染物質の除去: 細菌; 化学物質と塩素; 重金属; マイクロプラスチック; 原虫とシスト; 沈殿物; 味とにおい; ウイルス; その他
bg-BG: Премахване на замърсители: Бактерии; Химикали и хлор; Тежки метали; Микропластмаси; Протозои и кисти; Седименти; Вкус и мирис; Вируси; Друго
ru: Удаление загрязняющих веществ: Бактерии; Химические вещества и хлор; Тяжёлые металлы; Микропластик; Простейшие и цисты; Осадок; Вкус и запах; Вирусы; Другое
ko: 오염물질 제거: 박테리아; 화학 물질 및 염소; 중금속; 미세 플라스틱; 원생동물 및 포낭; 침전물; 맛과 냄새; 바이러스; 기타
it: Rimozione dei contaminanti: Batteri; Sostanze chimiche e cloro; Metalli pesanti; Microplastiche; Protozoi e cisti; Sedimento; Sapore e odore; Virus; Altro
da: Fjernelse af forurenende stoffer: Bakterier; Kemikalier og klor; Tungmetaller; Mikroplast; Protozoer og cyster; Sediment; Smag og lugt; Vira; Andet
pl: Usuwanie zanieczyszczeń: Bakterie; Substancje chemiczne i chlor; Metale ciężkie; Mikroplastik; Pierwotniaki i cysty; Osad; Smak i zapach; Wirusy; Inne
tr: Kirleticileri giderme: Bakteri; Kimyasallar ve klor; Ağır metaller; Mikroplastikler; Protozoa ve kistler; Tortu; Tat ve koku; Virüsler; Diğer
cs: Odstraňování nečistot: Bakterie; Chemikálie a chlor; Těžké kovy; Mikroplasty; Prvoci a cysty; Usazeniny; Zápach a pachuť; Viry; Jiné
hr-HR: Uklanjanje onečišćujućih tvari: Bakterije; Kemikalije i klor; Teški metali; Mikroplastika; Protozoe i ciste; Sediment; Okus i miris; Virusi; Ostalo
pt-PT: Remoção de contaminantes: Bactérias; Químicos e cloro; Metais pesados; Microplásticos; Protozoários e quistos; Sedimentos; Sabor e odor; Vírus; Outros
zh-CN: 污染物去除: 细菌; 化学品和氯; 重金属; 微塑料; 原生动物和孢囊; 沉淀物; 异味; 病毒; 其他
nl: Verwijdering van verontreinigingen: Bacteriën; Chemicaliën en chloor; Zware metalen; Microplastics; Protozoa en cysten; Sediment; Smaak en geur; Virussen; Overig
pt-BR: Remoção de contaminantes: Bactérias; Produtos químicos e cloro; Metais pesados; Microplásticos; Protozoários e cistos; Sedimentos; Sabor e odor; Vírus; Outro
th: การกำจัดสารปนเปื้อน: แบคทีเรีย; สารเคมีและคลอรีน; โลหะหนัก; ไมโครพลาสติก; โปรโตซัวและซีสต์; ตะกอน; รสและกลิ่น; ไวรัส; อื่นๆ
fr: Élimination des contaminants: Bactéries; Produits chimiques et chlore; Métaux lourds; Microplastiques; Protozoaires et kystes; Sédiments; Goût et odeur; Virus; Autre
en: Contaminant removal: Bacteria; Chemicals and chlorine; Heavy metals; Microplastics; Protozoa and cysts; Sediment; Taste and odor; Viruses; Other